Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-122 Place of business. (a)
Every licensed insurance producer shall have and maintain in this State, or, if
a nonresident insurance producer, in the nonresident's home state, a place of
business accessible to the public.

(b) The place of business shall be where the
licensee principally conducts transactions under the licensee's licenses.

(c) The licensee shall notify the commissioner
of any change of business address within thirty days of the change. [L 2001, c
216, pt of §2; am L 2006, c 189, §5; am L 2010, c 116, §1(8)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next